Colorado, session 2026A, SB079.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 22 to title
5 as follows:
ARTICLE 22
Uniform Assignment for Benefit of Creditors Act
5-22-101. Short title.
THIS ARTICLE 22 MAY BE CITED AS THE "UNIFORM ASSIGNMENT
FOR BENEFIT OF CREDITORS ACT".
5-22-102. Definitions.
-2- SB26-079

IN THIS ARTICLE 22, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(1) "AFFILIATE" MEANS:
(A) A PERSON THAT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY OWNS, CONTROLS,
OR HOLDS, WITH POWER TO VOTE, TWENTY PERCENT OR MORE OF THE
OUTSTANDING VOTING INTERESTS OF ANOTHER PERSON, OTHER THAN A
PERSON THAT HOLDS THE INTERESTS:
(i) IN A FIDUCIARY OR AGENCY CAPACITY WITHOUT SOLE
DISCRETIONARY POWER TO VOTE THE INTERESTS; OR
(ii) SOLELY TO SECURE A DEBT, IF THE PERSON HAS NOT IN FACT
EXERCISED THE POWER TO VOTE;
(B) A PERSON WITH TWENTY PERCENT OR MORE OF THE PERSON'S
OUTSTANDING VOTING INTERESTS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY OWNED,
CONTROLLED, OR HELD, WITH POWER TO VOTE, BY ANOTHER PERSON;
(C) A PERSON WHOSE BUSINESS IS OPERATED UNDER A LEASE OR
OPERATING AGREEMENT BY ANOTHER PERSON, OR A PERSON
SUBSTANTIALLY ALL OF WHOSE ASSETS ARE CONTROLLED BY THE OTHER
PERSON; OR
(D) A PERSON THAT OPERATES THE BUSINESS OR SUBSTANTIALLY
ALL THE ASSETS OF ANOTHER PERSON UNDER A LEASE OR OPERATING
AGREEMENT.
(2) (A) "ASSET" MEANS A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN
PROPERTY OF AN ASSIGNOR, REGARDLESS OF THE PERSON HOLDING OR IN
POSSESSION, CUSTODY, OR CONTROL OF THE PROPERTY OR WHERE THE
PROPERTY IS LOCATED.
(B) "ASSET" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(i) A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN PROPERTY RESTRICTED
FROM ASSIGNMENT IF THE RESTRICTION IS EFFECTIVE UNDER OTHER LAW,
-3- SB26-079

UNLESS THE OTHER LAW PERMITS ASSIGNMENT WITH THE CONSENT OF
ANOTHER PERSON AND THE PERSON CONSENTS TO THE ASSIGNMENT IN A
MANNER PERMITTED BY THE OTHER LAW; OR
(ii) IF THE ASSIGNOR IS AN INDIVIDUAL, A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE
INTEREST IN PROPERTY TO THE EXTENT IT IS EXEMPT FROM LEGAL PROCESS
UNDER OTHER LAW.
(3) "ASSIGNED ASSET" MEANS AN ASSET TRANSFERRED UNDER AN
ASSIGNMENT.
(4) "ASSIGNEE" MEANS A PERSON TO WHICH ASSETS ARE
TRANSFERRED UNDER AN ASSIGNMENT.
(5) "ASSIGNMENT" MEANS A TRANSFER BY A PERSON OF ALL THE
PERSON'S ASSETS TO ANOTHER PERSON FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE
TRANSFEROR'S CREDITORS.
(6) "ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT" MEANS AN AGREEMENT THAT
TRANSFERS OR PROVIDES FOR A TRANSFER OF ALL THE ASSIGNOR'S ASSETS.
(7) "ASSIGNMENT ESTATE" MEANS THE ASSETS HELD AT A GIVEN
TIME BY THE ASSIGNEE UNDER AN ASSIGNMENT.
(8) "ASSIGNOR" MEANS A PERSON WHOSE ASSETS ARE
TRANSFERRED UNDER AN ASSIGNMENT.
(9) "CLAIM" MEANS A CREDITOR'S RIGHT TO PAYMENT OR TO AN
EQUITABLE REMEDY, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE RIGHT IS REDUCED TO
JUDGMENT, LIQUIDATED, UNLIQUIDATED, FIXED, CONTINGENT, MATURED,
UNMATURED, DISPUTED, UNDISPUTED, LEGAL, EQUITABLE, SECURED, OR
UNSECURED.
(10) "COHABITANT" MEANS EACH OF TWO INDIVIDUALS NOT
MARRIED TO EACH OTHER WHO LIVE TOGETHER AS A COUPLE AFTER EACH
HAS REACHED THE AGE OF MAJORITY OR BEEN EMANCIPATED.
-4- SB26-079

(11) "CREDITOR" MEANS A PERSON THAT HAS A CLAIM AGAINST AN
ASSIGNED ASSET OR THE ASSIGNOR.
(12) "ELECTRONIC" MEANS RELATING TO TECHNOLOGY HAVING
ELECTRICAL, DIGITAL, MAGNETIC, WIRELESS, OPTICAL,
ELECTROMAGNETIC, OR SIMILAR CAPABILITIES.
(13) "GOOD FAITH" MEANS HONESTY IN FACT AND THE
OBSERVANCE OF REASONABLE COMMERCIAL STANDARDS OF FAIR DEALING.
(14) "INSIDER" INCLUDES:
(A) IN THE CASE OF AN INDIVIDUAL:
(i) A RELATIVE OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
(ii) A PARTNERSHIP OR LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY IN WHICH THE
INDIVIDUAL IS A GENERAL PARTNER OR MANAGING MEMBER; OR
(iii) AN ORGANIZATION OF WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS A DIRECTOR,
OFFICER, OR PERSON IN CONTROL;
(B) IN THE CASE OF AN ORGANIZATION:
(i) A DIRECTOR, OFFICER, MANAGER, OR OTHER PERSON IN
CONTROL OF OR WITH CONTROLLING EQUITY INTEREST IN THE
ORGANIZATION;
(ii) A PARTNERSHIP OR LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY IN WHICH THE
ORGANIZATION IS A GENERAL PARTNER OR MANAGING MEMBER;
(iii) A GENERAL PARTNER OR MANAGING MEMBER OF THE
ORGANIZATION; OR
(iv) A RELATIVE OF A GENERAL PARTNER, MANAGING MEMBER,
DIRECTOR, OFFICER, MANAGER, OR OTHER PERSON IN CONTROL OF OR WITH
CONTROLLING EQUITY INTEREST IN THE ORGANIZATION;
(C) AN AFFILIATE; OR
(D) A MANAGING AGENT OF AN ORGANIZATION.
-5- SB26-079

(15) "LIEN" MEANS AN INTEREST IN AN ASSET THAT SECURES
PAYMENT OR PERFORMANCE OF AN OBLIGATION.
(16) "ORGANIZATION" MEANS A PERSON OTHER THAN AN
INDIVIDUAL.
(17) "PERFECTED LIEN" MEANS A LIEN ON:
(A) REAL PROPERTY OTHER THAN FIXTURES ON WHICH A BONA
FIDE PURCHASER OF THE PROPERTY CANNOT ACQUIRE AN INTEREST
SUPERIOR TO THE INTEREST OF THE LIENHOLDER; OR
(B) FIXTURES OR PROPERTY OTHER THAN REAL PROPERTY ON
WHICH A CREDITOR CANNOT ACQUIRE A LIEN BY ATTACHMENT, LEVY, OR
THE LIKE THAT IS SUPERIOR TO THE INTEREST OF THE LIENHOLDER.
(18) (A) "PERSON" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL, ESTATE, BUSINESS OR
NONPROFIT ENTITY, GOVERNMENT OR GOVERNMENTAL SUBDIVISION,
AGENCY, OR INSTRUMENTALITY, OR OTHER LEGAL ENTITY.
(B) "PERSON" INCLUDES A PROTECTED SERIES, HOWEVER
DENOMINATED, OF AN ENTITY IF THE PROTECTED SERIES IS ESTABLISHED
UNDER LAW THAT LIMITS, OR LIMITS IF CONDITIONS SPECIFIED UNDER LAW
ARE SATISFIED, THE ABILITY OF A CREDITOR OF THE ENTITY OR OF ANY
OTHER PROTECTED SERIES OF THE ENTITY TO SATISFY A CLAIM FROM
ASSETS OF THE PROTECTED SERIES.
(19) "PROOF OF CLAIM" MEANS A RECORD A CREDITOR SUBMITS TO
AN ASSIGNEE TO EVIDENCE THE CREDITOR'S CLAIM.
(20) "RECORD" MEANS INFORMATION:
(A) INSCRIBED ON A TANGIBLE MEDIUM; OR
(B) STORED IN AN ELECTRONIC OR OTHER MEDIUM AND
RETRIEVABLE IN PERCEIVABLE FORM.
(21) "RELATIVE" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL RELATED BY AFFINITY OR
-6- SB26-079

CONSANGUINITY WITHIN THE THIRD DEGREE OR A COHABITANT.
(22) "SECURITY INTEREST" MEANS A LIEN CREATED BY AN
AGREEMENT.
(23) "SEND", IN CONNECTION WITH A RECORD OR NOTIFICATION,
MEANS:
(A) TO DEPOSIT IN THE MAIL, DELIVER FOR TRANSMISSION, OR
TRANSMIT BY ANY OTHER USUAL MEANS OF COMMUNICATION, WITH
POSTAGE OR COST OF TRANSMISSION PROVIDED FOR, ADDRESSED TO ANY
ADDRESS REASONABLE UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES; OR
(B) TO CAUSE THE RECORD OR NOTIFICATION TO BE RECEIVED
WITHIN THE TIME IT WOULD HAVE BEEN RECEIVED IF PROPERLY SENT AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (23)(A) OF THIS SECTION.
(24) "SIGN" MEANS, WITH PRESENT INTENT TO AUTHENTICATE OR
ADOPT A RECORD, TO:
(A) EXECUTE OR ADOPT A TANGIBLE SYMBOL; OR
(B) ATTACH TO OR LOGICALLY ASSOCIATE WITH THE RECORD AN
ELECTRONIC SYMBOL, SOUND, OR PROCESS.
(25) (A) "STATE" MEANS A STATE OF THE UNITED STATES, THE
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, PUERTO RICO, THE UNITED STATES VIRGIN
ISLANDS, OR ANY OTHER TERRITORY OR POSSESSION SUBJECT TO THE
JURISDICTION OF THE UNITED STATES.
(B) "STATE" INCLUDES A FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED INDIAN TRIBE.
(26) "TRANSFER" MEANS DISPOSING OF OR PARTING WITH AN ASSET
OR WITH AN INTEREST IN AN ASSET, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
DISPOSITION OR PARTING IS INDIRECT, CONDITIONAL, OR INVOLUNTARY.
5-22-103. Scope.
THIS ARTICLE 22 APPLIES TO AN ASSIGNMENT MADE BY AN
-7- SB26-079

ASSIGNOR THAT IS:
(1) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS IS IN
THIS STATE;
(2) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE INTERNAL AFFAIRS ARE GOVERNED
BY OTHER LAW OF THIS STATE;
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE IS IN THIS STATE;
(4) AN ORGANIZATION WHOLLY OWNED, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY,
BY AN ASSIGNOR THAT SATISFIES SUBSECTION (1), (2), OR (3) OF THIS
SECTION; OR
(5) AN ORGANIZATION THAT:
(A) IS PARTLY OWNED, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, AND
CONTROLLED BY AN ASSIGNOR THAT SATISFIES SUBSECTION (1), (2), OR (3)
OF THIS SECTION;
(B) HAS NO PLACE OF BUSINESS OR EMPLOYEES; AND
(C) RELIES ON THE SERVICES THE ORGANIZATION RECEIVES FROM
AN ASSIGNOR THAT SATISFIES SUBSECTION (1), (2), OR (3) OF THIS
SECTION.
5-22-104. Requirements for assignee - assignment agreement.
(a) AN ASSIGNEE MUST BE A PERSON THAT:
(1) IS NOT A CREDITOR, AFFILIATE, OR INSIDER OF THE ASSIGNOR;
(2) IS NOT AN AFFILIATE OR INSIDER OF A CREDITOR OF THE
ASSIGNOR;
(3) DOES NOT HAVE A CLAIM AGAINST THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE,
OTHER THAN A CLAIM FOR FEES AND EXPENSES TO BE PAID UNDER THE
ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT;
(4) DOES NOT HAVE A MATERIAL FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE
OUTCOME OF THE ASSIGNMENT, OTHER THAN A CLAIM FOR FEES AND
-8- SB26-079

EXPENSES TO BE PAID UNDER THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT;
(5) DOES NOT HOLD AN EQUITY INTEREST IN THE ASSIGNOR, OTHER
THAN A NONCONTROLLING INTEREST IN A PUBLICLY TRADED COMPANY;
AND
(6) IS NOT AN AFFILIATE OF A PERSON THAT FAILS TO SATISFY
SUBSECTION (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), OR (a)(5) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A PERSON THAT SATISFIES SUBSECTION (a) OF THIS SECTION IS
NOT PRECLUDED FROM BEING AN ASSIGNEE MERELY BECAUSE THE PERSON
PERFORMED SERVICES FOR THE ASSIGNOR BEFORE THE ASSIGNMENT.
(c) AN ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT MUST BE IN A RECORD SIGNED BY
THE ASSIGNOR AND THE ASSIGNEE. THE RECORD MUST:
(1) STATE THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE ASSIGNOR AND OF THE
ASSIGNEE;
(2) TRANSFER OR PROVIDE FOR A TRANSFER OF ALL THE
ASSIGNOR'S ASSETS;
(3) DESCRIBE THE ASSIGNED ASSETS IN SUFFICIENT DETAIL TO
IDENTIFY THE ASSETS;
(4) PROVIDE FOR THE DISTRIBUTION OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE;
(5) DESCRIBE THE FEES TO BE CHARGED BY THE ASSIGNEE IN
CONNECTION WITH THE ASSIGNMENT, INCLUDING THE BASIS ON WHICH
THEY ARE TO BE CALCULATED; AND
(6) INCLUDE A REPRESENTATION BY THE ASSIGNOR, UNDER
PENALTY OF PERJURY, THAT THE ASSIGNOR IS ASSIGNING ALL THE
ASSIGNOR'S ASSETS.
(d) IF AN ASSIGNEE RELIES IN GOOD FAITH ON THE ASSIGNOR'S
REPRESENTATION MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (c)(6) OF THIS SECTION, ALL
THE ASSIGNOR'S ASSETS ARE DEEMED TO BE ASSIGNED, EVEN IF THE
-9- SB26-079

REPRESENTATION IS INACCURATE.
5-22-105. Effect of assignment - effective date of assignment
agreement.
(a) AN ASSIGNEE OBTAINS THE RIGHTS, TITLE, AND INTERESTS OF
THE ASSIGNOR IN THE ASSIGNED ASSETS.
(b) IF THE ASSIGNOR IS AN ORGANIZATION, AN ASSIGNEE OBTAINS
THE RIGHTS, TITLE, AND INTERESTS OF THE ASSIGNOR IN ASSETS ACQUIRED
AFTER THE ASSIGNMENT.
(c) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 5-22-110 (b)(12), AN
ASSIGNEE TAKES EACH ASSIGNED ASSET SUBJECT TO AN EXISTING
INTEREST IN THE ASSET HELD BY ANOTHER PERSON.
(d) AN ASSIGNEE HOLDS THE ASSIGNED ASSETS SUBJECT TO THE
ASSIGNEE'S DUTIES UNDER SECTION 5-22-109.
(e) AN ASSIGNMENT IS SUBJECT TO OTHER LAW UNDER WHICH THE
ASSIGNMENT MAY BE FRAUDULENT OR OTHERWISE VOIDABLE.
(f) THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF AN ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT IS THE
DATE THE AGREEMENT IS SIGNED BY THE LAST PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT
THAT IS REQUIRED TO SIGN THE AGREEMENT UNLESS A LATER DATE IS
IDENTIFIED IN THE AGREEMENT AS THE EFFECTIVE DATE.
5-22-106. Filing - recording - title transfer - definition.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, "FINANCING STATEMENT" HAS THE MEANING
SET FORTH IN SECTION 4-9-102 (a)(39).
(b) AN ASSIGNEE OF A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN
PERSONAL PROPERTY MAY FILE A FINANCING STATEMENT IN THE FILING
OFFICE OF:
(1) THIS STATE, ESTABLISHED FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 4-9-501
(a)(2);
-10- SB26-079

(2) ANY OTHER STATE IN WHICH:
(A) THE ASSIGNOR WOULD BE LOCATED UNDER SECTION 4-9-307
IF THE ASSIGNOR WERE A DEBTOR FOR THE PURPOSE OF THAT SECTION; OR
(B) AN ASSET OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE MAY BE LOCATED.
(c) A FINANCING STATEMENT FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (b)(2)(B)
OF THIS SECTION MUST INDICATE THAT IT IS FILED IN CONNECTION WITH AN
ASSIGNMENT.
(d) WHEN FILING A FINANCING STATEMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (b)
OF THIS SECTION, THE ASSIGNEE MUST:
(1) ATTACH A COPY OF THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT TO THE
FINANCING STATEMENT; OR
(2) STATE ON THE FINANCING STATEMENT THAT A COPY OF THE
ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT IS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST TO THE ASSIGNEE.
(e) A FINANCING STATEMENT FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (b) OF
THIS SECTION MAY:
(1) DESIGNATE THE ASSIGNOR AS "DEBTOR" AND THE ASSIGNEE AS
"SECURED PARTY"; OR
(2) USE THE TERMS "ASSIGNOR" AND "ASSIGNEE" OR WORDS OF
SIMILAR IMPORT.
(f) THE FILING OF A FINANCING STATEMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (b)
OF THIS SECTION IS NOT ITSELF A FACTOR IN DETERMINING WHETHER AN
ASSET SECURES AN OBLIGATION. THE RIGHTS OF THE ASSIGNEE UNDER THE
ASSIGNMENT ARE NOT AFFECTED IF THE ASSIGNEE DOES NOT FILE A
FINANCING STATEMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS SECTION.
(g) AN ASSIGNEE OF A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN REAL
PROPERTY SHALL RECORD THE ASSIGNMENT OF THE INTEREST OR NOTICE
OF THE ASSIGNMENT UNDER THE REAL ESTATE RECORDING LAW OF THE
-11- SB26-079

JURISDICTION WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.
(h) AN ASSIGNEE SHALL COMPLY WITH OTHER LAW GOVERNING
THE TRANSFER OF TITLE TO AN ASSET.
(i) BY SIGNING AN ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT, THE ASSIGNOR
AUTHORIZES THE ASSIGNEE TO TAKE THE ACTIONS REQUIRED BY THIS
SECTION.
5-22-107. Notification to creditors.
(a) UNLESS A CREDITOR WAIVES IN A SIGNED RECORD THE RIGHT
TO NOTIFICATION, AN ASSIGNEE SHALL SEND A NOTIFICATION OF THE
ASSIGNMENT TO EACH CREDITOR KNOWN TO THE ASSIGNEE WITHIN A
REASONABLE TIME NOT TO EXCEED THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT.
(b) THE NOTIFICATION MUST:
(1) BE IN A RECORD SIGNED BY THE ASSIGNEE;
(2) INCLUDE THE ASSIGNEE'S NAME, ADDRESS, AND OTHER
CONTACT INFORMATION REASONABLY NECESSARY TO COMMUNICATE WITH
THE ASSIGNEE;
(3) PROVIDE REASONABLE INSTRUCTIONS FOR SUBMITTING A
PROOF OF CLAIM USING THE METHOD ESTABLISHED BY THE ASSIGNEE
UNDER SECTION 5-22-109 (b)(5); AND
(4) IDENTIFY THE DATE ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 5-22-109
(b)(6) BY WHICH EACH CREDITOR WHOSE CLAIM IS NOT OTHERWISE
ALLOWED WITHOUT A TIMELY PROOF OF CLAIM UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22
MUST SUBMIT A PROOF OF CLAIM.
(c) AN ASSIGNEE SHALL USE REASONABLE MEANS TO PROVIDE THE
INFORMATION IN SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS SECTION TO UNKNOWN
CREDITORS, INCLUDING BY ANY MEANS THE ASSIGNOR REGULARLY USED
-12- SB26-079

TO:
(1) PROVIDE INFORMATION TO THE ASSIGNOR'S CREDITORS; OR
(2) COMMUNICATE INFORMATION ABOUT THE ASSIGNOR, OTHER
THAN ADVERTISING, TO THE PUBLIC.
5-22-108. Duties of assignor.
(a) SUBJECT TO SECTION 5-22-123, AN ASSIGNOR HAS A DUTY TO
TAKE ALL REASONABLE ACTIONS NECESSARY FOR THE ASSIGNEE TO
ADMINISTER THE ASSIGNMENT, THE ASSIGNED ASSETS, AND THE
ASSIGNMENT ESTATE.
(b) IN FURTHERANCE OF THE DUTY UNDER SUBSECTION (a) OF THIS
SECTION, THE ASSIGNOR SHALL:
(1) PRESERVE AND TURN OVER TO THE ASSIGNEE THE ASSIGNED
ASSETS IN THE ASSIGNOR'S POSSESSION OR CONTROL;
(2) PROVIDE TO THE ASSIGNEE INFORMATION REASONABLY
NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE ASSIGNMENT, THE ASSIGNED ASSETS, AND
THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE;
(3) SIGN ANY RECORD REASONABLY NECESSARY TO TRANSFER AN
ASSIGNED ASSET AND COMPLY WITH ANY NOTARIZATION REQUIRED UNDER
OTHER LAW;
(4) DESIGNATE, AND PROVIDE THE ASSIGNEE WITH THE NAME,
ADDRESS, AND OTHER CONTACT INFORMATION REASONABLY NECESSARY
TO COMMUNICATE WITH, AN APPROPRIATE PERSON WILLING AND ABLE TO
ACT AS A REPRESENTATIVE ON BEHALF OF THE ASSIGNOR AS MAY BE
REASONABLY NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE ASSIGNMENT, THE
ASSIGNED ASSETS, AND THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE;
(5) IF THE ASSIGNMENT INCLUDES A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE
INTEREST IN REAL PROPERTY OR TITLED PERSONAL PROPERTY, COOPERATE
-13- SB26-079

WITH THE ASSIGNEE IN TAKING ACTIONS UNDER SECTION 5-22-106;
(6) ON OR AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE
OF THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT, PROVIDE THE ASSIGNEE:
(A) A LIST OF ALL ASSETS;
(B) A LIST OF ALL THE ASSIGNOR'S EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING THOSE
WHOSE EMPLOYMENT IS TERMINATED IN CONNECTION WITH THE
ASSIGNMENT; AND
(C) A LIST OF ALL THE ASSIGNOR'S KNOWN CREDITORS, INCLUDING,
FOR EACH CREDITOR, THE CREDITOR'S ADDRESS AND OTHER CONTACT
INFORMATION REASONABLY NECESSARY TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE
CREDITOR;
(7) VERIFY UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY THE ACCURACY OF THE
LISTS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (b)(6) OF THIS SECTION;
(8) WITH RESPECT TO A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN
PROPERTY RESTRICTED FROM ASSIGNMENT, COOPERATE WITH THE
ASSIGNEE TO OBTAIN CONSENT FROM A PERSON WHOSE CONSENT TO
ASSIGN THE INTEREST IS NECESSARY UNDER OTHER LAW; AND
(9) PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO THE ASSIGNEE AS REQUIRED BY THE
ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT.
(c) THE DUTIES IN THIS SECTION ALSO APPLY TO A
REPRESENTATIVE DESIGNATED UNDER SUBSECTION (b)(4) OF THIS
SECTION.
5-22-109. Duties of assignee.
(a) SUBJECT TO SECTION 5-22-123, AN ASSIGNEE HAS A FIDUCIARY
DUTY TO THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE FOR THE BENEFIT OF CREDITORS:
(1) OF LOYALTY, INCLUDING THE DUTY TO MANAGE THE
ASSIGNMENT IN GOOD FAITH;
-14- SB26-079

(2) TO USE REASONABLE CARE TO MAXIMIZE DISTRIBUTIONS
UNDER SECTION 5-22-115; AND
(3) TO WIND UP THE ASSIGNMENT UNDER SECTION 5-22-119 IN A
MANNER COMPATIBLE WITH THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE ASSIGNMENT
ESTATE AND CREDITORS.
(b) WITHOUT LIMITATION ON THE DUTIES UNDER SUBSECTION (a)
OF THIS SECTION, AND SUBJECT TO SECTION 5-22-123, THE ASSIGNEE ALSO
HAS A DUTY TO:
(1) MAINTAIN A SEPARATE DEPOSIT ACCOUNT FOR FUNDS RELATED
TO THE ASSIGNMENT;
(2) COLLECT ON OR DISPOSE OF EACH ASSIGNED ASSET, UNLESS
THE ASSIGNEE DETERMINES IT IS MORE ECONOMICALLY EFFICIENT TO
ABANDON THE ASSET;
(3) PREPARE AND RETAIN APPROPRIATE BUSINESS RECORDS,
INCLUDING A RECORD OF EACH RECEIPT, DISBURSEMENT, AND COLLECTION
ON OR DISPOSITION OF AN ASSIGNED ASSET;
(4) PAY ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE,
TO THE EXTENT THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE HAS SUFFICIENT
UNENCUMBERED ASSETS;
(5) ESTABLISH A METHOD THAT IS REASONABLY DESIGNED TO
PERMIT A CREDITOR TO SUBMIT A PROOF OF CLAIM;
(6) ESTABLISH A SINGLE DATE BY WHICH CREDITORS WHOSE
CLAIMS ARE NOT OTHERWISE ALLOWED WITHOUT TIMELY PROOFS OF
CLAIM UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22 MUST SUBMIT PROOFS OF CLAIM, WHICH
MUST BE ONE HUNDRED TWENTY DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE
ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT;
(7) UNLESS A CLAIM WOULD RECEIVE MINIMAL OR NO
-15- SB26-079

DISTRIBUTION WITHOUT REGARD TO THE CLAIM'S VALIDITY OR ASSERTED
PRIORITY, EXAMINE THE VALIDITY AND PRIORITY OF CLAIMS AGAINST THE
ASSIGNMENT ESTATE AND, IF NECESSARY, CONSULT WITH THE
REPRESENTATIVE DESIGNATED BY THE ASSIGNOR UNDER SECTION
5-22-108 (b)(4);
(8) AT LEAST EVERY SIX MONTHS, PROVIDE TO EACH CREDITOR A
SUMMARY OF THE ASSETS, LIABILITIES, AND EXPENSES OF THE
ASSIGNMENT ESTATE;
(9) COMPLY WITH ALL REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL INTERNAL
REVENUE SERVICE AND STATE AND LOCAL TAXING AUTHORITIES;
(10) SEND A NOTIFICATION TO EACH CREDITOR OF THE ASSIGNEE'S
COMPENSATION AND ANY CHANGE IN THE METHOD OF DETERMINING THE
ASSIGNEE'S COMPENSATION FROM THE METHOD PROVIDED IN THE
ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT;
(11) SEND A FINAL ACCOUNTING UNDER SECTION 5-22-119 (a);
AND
(12) COMPLY WITH THE OTHER REQUIREMENTS IMPOSED ON THE
ASSIGNEE UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22.
5-22-110. Powers of assignee.
(a) AN ASSIGNEE HAS THE POWERS NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE
TO PERFORM THE ASSIGNEE'S DUTIES.
(b) UNLESS THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT EXPRESSLY PROVIDES
OTHERWISE, THE ASSIGNEE HAS POWER TO:
(1) OPERATE AN EXISTING BUSINESS THAT USES AN ASSIGNED
ASSET, INCLUDING PRESERVATION OF THE ASSET AND COLLECTION ON, OR
THE SALE, LEASE, LICENSE, OR OTHER DISPOSITION OF, THE ASSET;
(2) INCUR SECURED OR UNSECURED DEBT AND PAY EXPENSES
-16- SB26-079

INCIDENTAL TO THE EXERCISE OF THE POWER UNDER SUBSECTION (b)(1)
OF THIS SECTION;
(3) ASSERT A RIGHT, CLAIM, CAUSE OF ACTION, OR DEFENSE THE
ASSIGNOR COULD HAVE ASSERTED THAT RELATES TO THE ASSIGNMENT
ESTATE;
(4) ENGAGE PROFESSIONALS, INCLUDING A PROFESSIONAL
PREVIOUSLY ENGAGED BY THE ASSIGNOR, TO GIVE ADVICE, TO PROSECUTE
OR DEFEND LITIGATION, OR FOR OTHER PURPOSES AS THE ASSIGNEE
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE, AND PAY PROFESSIONALS REASONABLE FEES FOR
SERVICES FROM THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE;
(5) COLLECT ON, OR SELL, LEASE, LICENSE, OR OTHERWISE DISPOSE
OF, AN ASSET OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
ASSET IS SUBJECT TO A LIEN OR OTHER ENCUMBRANCE;
(6) EXERCISE A RIGHT TO REDEEM AN ASSET OF THE ASSIGNMENT
ESTATE THAT IS SUBJECT TO A MORTGAGE, DEED OF TRUST, SECURITY
INTEREST, OR OTHER ENCUMBRANCE;
(7) SETTLE A MATTER INVOLVING A DEBTOR OF THE ASSIGNOR;
(8) PROSECUTE OR DEFEND LITIGATION PENDING ON THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT IN FAVOR OF OR AGAINST THE
ASSIGNOR IN THE MANNER AND WITH THE SAME EFFECT AS THE ASSIGNOR
COULD HAVE DONE IF THE ASSIGNMENT HAD NOT BEEN MADE;
(9) RECOVER AN ASSET IN THE MANNER AND WITH THE SAME
EFFECT AS THE ASSIGNOR COULD HAVE DONE IF THE ASSIGNMENT HAD NOT
BEEN MADE;
(10) SETTLE CLAIMS AGAINST THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE;
(11) ABANDON AN ASSIGNED ASSET;
(12) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (e) OF THIS SECTION,
-17- SB26-079

AVOID A TRANSFER OR THE INCURRENCE OF AN OBLIGATION WHICH A
CREDITOR THAT HAS FILED A PROOF OF CLAIM COULD HAVE AVOIDED
UNDER OTHER LAW IF THE ASSIGNMENT HAD NOT BEEN MADE; AND
(13) INVEST FUNDS, SUBJECT TO APPLICABLE PRUDENT INVESTOR
STANDARDS UNDER OTHER LAW.
(c) THE POWER UNDER SUBSECTION (b)(12) OF THIS SECTION IS
EXCLUSIVE TO THE ASSIGNEE WITH RESPECT TO A CREDITOR THAT SUBMITS
A PROOF OF CLAIM. A RECOVERY BY THE ASSIGNEE IN THE EXERCISE OF
THIS POWER MUST BE FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE BUT
MAY NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT, ASSET, OR OTHER VALUE THE CREDITOR
COULD HAVE OBTAINED BY THE AVOIDANCE.
(d) FOR THE PURPOSE OF EXERCISING THE ASSIGNEE'S POWER
UNDER SUBSECTION (b)(12) OF THIS SECTION, EXERCISING A
VOIDABLE-TRANSACTION REMEDY, OR OTHERWISE ESTABLISHING THE
PRIORITY OF THE ASSIGNEE'S INTEREST, AN ASSIGNEE HAS A LIEN ON THE
ASSIGNMENT ESTATE AND THE STATUS OF:
(1) A LIEN CREDITOR UNDER SECTION 4-9-102 (a)(52)(B) AS TO AN
ASSET THAT IS A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN PERSONAL PROPERTY
OR FIXTURES;
(2) A BONA FIDE PURCHASER UNDER SECTION 38-35-109 AS TO AN
ASSET THAT IS A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN REAL PROPERTY,
OTHER THAN FIXTURES, LOCATED IN THIS STATE; AND
(3) A BONA FIDE PURCHASER UNDER THE LAW OF ANOTHER STATE
AS TO AN ASSET THAT IS A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN REAL
PROPERTY, OTHER THAN FIXTURES, LOCATED IN THE OTHER STATE.
(e) AN ASSIGNEE'S POWER UNDER SUBSECTION (b)(12) OF THIS
SECTION TO AVOID A TRANSFER MADE BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE
-18- SB26-079

ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH A SWAP
AGREEMENT, SECURITIES CONTRACT, COMMODITY CONTRACT, FORWARD
CONTRACT, REPURCHASE AGREEMENT, OR MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT,
IS LIMITED TO THE EXTENT A TRUSTEE WOULD NOT HAVE THE POWER TO
AVOID THE TRANSFER UNDER THE FEDERAL BANKRUPTCY CODE OF 1978,
TITLE 11 OF THE UNITED STATES CODE, AS AMENDED.
(f) AN ASSIGNEE SHALL EXERCISE THE POWERS UNDER THIS
SECTION CONSISTENT WITH THE ASSIGNEE'S FIDUCIARY DUTY UNDER
SECTION 5-22-109 (a).
5-22-111. Allowed claim.
(a) AN ASSIGNEE SHALL ALLOW A CREDITOR'S CLAIM IF:
(1) THE CREDITOR SUBMITS A PROOF OF CLAIM IN COMPLIANCE
WITH SECTION 5-22-113; AND
(2) THE ASSIGNEE DOES NOT DISPUTE THE CLAIM UNDER SECTION
5-22-112 BEFORE FINAL DISTRIBUTION.
(b) AN ASSIGNEE MAY:
(1) ALLOW A CLAIM, PAY A KNOWN LIQUIDATED CLAIM, OR ACCEPT
A NOTICE TO THE ASSIGNEE OF A CLAIM RECEIVED BY THE DATE
ESTABLISHED BY THE ASSIGNEE UNDER SECTION 5-22-109 (b)(6) EVEN IF
THE CREDITOR DOES NOT SUBMIT A PROOF OF CLAIM; OR
(2) ALLOW AND PAY A CLAIM EVIDENCED BY A LATE-FILED PROOF
OF CLAIM IF THE ASSIGNEE DETERMINES THERE IS A REASONABLE BASIS
FOR EXCUSING THE LATE FILING.
(c) ANY UNSECURED PORTION OF AN ALLOWED CLAIM SHALL BE
VALUED AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT.
(d) A CREDITOR'S CLAIM IS ALLOWED IF THE CREDITOR SUCCEEDS
IN A DISPUTE UNDER SECTION 5-22-112 (b).
-19- SB26-079

(e) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (f) OF THIS SECTION, AFTER
EXPIRATION OF THE TIME FOR SUBMITTING A PROOF OF CLAIM, THE
ASSIGNEE SHALL CREATE A COMPLETE LIST OF CREDITORS THAT HAVE
SUBMITTED A PROOF OF CLAIM IN COMPLIANCE WITH SECTION 5-22-113.
FOR EACH CREDITOR'S CLAIM, THE LIST MUST STATE:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF THE CLAIM, IF THE AMOUNT IS KNOWN TO THE
ASSIGNEE; AND
(2) WHETHER THE CLAIM IS SECURED OR UNSECURED AND, IF
SECURED, DESCRIBE THE COLLATERAL FOR THE CLAIM.
(f) IF A CLASS OF CREDITORS WILL RECEIVE NO DISTRIBUTION ON
ACCOUNT OF ALLOWED CLAIMS, THE ASSIGNEE SHALL SEND A NOTICE IN A
RECORD TO EACH CREDITOR IN THAT CLASS THAT THE CREDITOR WILL
RECEIVE NO DISTRIBUTION INSTEAD OF THE LIST REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION
(e) OF THIS SECTION.
(g) IF REQUESTED BY A CREDITOR OR OTHER PARTY WITH AN
INTEREST IN THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE, THE ASSIGNEE SHALL PROVIDE THE
LIST CREATED UNDER SUBSECTION (e) OF THIS SECTION TO THE PERSON
MAKING THE REQUEST TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY PRIVACY LAWS AND
SUBJECT TO ANY PRIVACY SAFEGUARDS THE ASSIGNEE DETERMINES IN THE
ASSIGNEE'S BUSINESS JUDGMENT ARE REASONABLY NECESSARY.
5-22-112. Disputed claims - disallowed claims.
(a) AN ASSIGNEE MAY DISPUTE A CREDITOR'S CLAIM BEFORE FINAL
DISTRIBUTION BY SENDING NOTIFICATION IN A RECORD STATING THE
NATURE OF THE ASSIGNEE'S DISPUTE TO THE CREDITOR.
(b) IF A DISPUTE CANNOT BE RESOLVED CONSENSUALLY, THE
ASSIGNEE MAY COMMENCE A PROCEEDING UNDER SECTION 5-22-121 TO
DISALLOW THE CLAIM. THE ASSIGNEE MUST COMMENCE THE PROCEEDING
-20- SB26-079

BEFORE FINAL DISTRIBUTION UNDER SECTION 5-22-115. IF THE
PROCEEDING IS NOT FILED BEFORE FINAL DISTRIBUTION, THE ASSIGNEE
SHALL ALLOW THE CLAIM UNDER SECTION 5-22-111.
(c) AN ASSIGNEE SHALL CREATE A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR RESERVE
FOR THE ESTIMATED AMOUNT OF THE POTENTIAL DISTRIBUTION ON A
DISPUTED CLAIM.
(d) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS SECTION, AN ASSIGNEE
SHALL DISALLOW A CLAIM FOR REIMBURSEMENT OR CONTRIBUTION OF A
PERSON THAT IS LIABLE WITH THE ASSIGNOR ON, OR THAT HAS SECURED,
THE CLAIM, TO THE EXTENT:
(1) THE CLAIM AGAINST THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE IS DISALLOWED;
(2) THE CLAIM FOR REIMBURSEMENT OR CONTRIBUTION IS
CONTINGENT AS OF THE TIME OF ALLOWANCE OR DISALLOWANCE; OR
(3) THE PERSON ASSERTS A RIGHT OF SUBROGATION TO THE RIGHTS
OF A CREDITOR.
(e) A CLAIM FOR REIMBURSEMENT OR CONTRIBUTION OF A PERSON
LIABLE WITH THE ASSIGNOR ON, OR THAT HAS SECURED, THE CLAIM THAT
BECOMES FIXED AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE ASSIGNMENT
AGREEMENT SHALL BE DETERMINED, AND SHALL BE ALLOWED OR
DISALLOWED, SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS SECTION, AS IF THE
CLAIM HAD BECOME FIXED BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE
ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT.
(f) AN ASSIGNEE MAY RECONSIDER THE ASSIGNEE'S DECISION TO
ALLOW OR DISALLOW A CLAIM FOR CAUSE. IF A RECONSIDERED CLAIM IS
ALLOWED UNDER SECTION 5-22-111, BEFORE THE ASSIGNEE MAKES
ADDITIONAL PAYMENTS OR TRANSFERS TO OTHER CREDITORS THAT ARE
EQUAL OR JUNIOR IN PRIORITY UNDER SECTION 5-22-115 TO THE
-21- SB26-079

RECONSIDERED CLAIM, THE CREDITOR WITH THE RECONSIDERED CLAIM
SHALL RECEIVE A PAYMENT OR TRANSFER IN AN AMOUNT PROPORTIONATE
IN VALUE TO THE PAYMENTS OR TRANSFERS ALREADY RECEIVED BY THE
OTHER CREDITORS. THIS SUBSECTION (f) DOES NOT MODIFY THE
ASSIGNEE'S RIGHT UNDER OTHER LAW TO RECOVER FROM A CREDITOR AN
EXCESS PAYMENT OR TRANSFER MADE TO THE CREDITOR. IF A
RECONSIDERED CLAIM IS DISALLOWED, THE ASSIGNEE SHALL COMPLY WITH
SUBSECTIONS (b) AND (c) OF THIS SECTION.
5-22-113. Proof of claim.
(a) A PROOF OF CLAIM MUST:
(1) STATE THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND OTHER CONTACT
INFORMATION REASONABLY NECESSARY TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE
CREDITOR;
(2) STATE THE AMOUNT OF THE CLAIM;
(3) BRIEFLY STATE THE NATURE OF THE CLAIM;
(4) IDENTIFY ANY ASSET OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE SECURING
THE CLAIM;
(5) BE SIGNED BY THE CREDITOR UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY;
(6) INCLUDE A COPY OF A RECORD, IF ANY, ON WHICH THE CLAIM
IS BASED;
(7) BE SUBMITTED USING THE METHOD ESTABLISHED UNDER
SECTION 5-22-109 (b)(5); AND
(8) BE SUBMITTED BY THE DATE ESTABLISHED BY THE ASSIGNEE
UNDER SECTION 5-22-109 (b)(6).
(b) A PROOF OF CLAIM SUBMITTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SECTION IS PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE OF THE VALIDITY AND AMOUNT OF THE
CLAIM.
-22- SB26-079

(c) THE SUBMISSION BY A CREDITOR OF A PROOF OF CLAIM IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION CONSTITUTES THE CREDITOR'S:
(1) CONSENT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE COURT UNDER SECTION
5-22-121; AND
(2) ASSIGNMENT TO THE ASSIGNEE OF ANY RIGHT OF THE CREDITOR
TO BRING A VOIDABLE TRANSACTION ACTION RELATING TO THE
CREDITOR'S CLAIM.
5-22-114. Rights of transferees.
(a) AN ASSIGNEE'S DISPOSITION OF AN ASSET:
(1) TRANSFERS TO A TRANSFEREE FOR VALUE ALL OF THE
ASSIGNEE'S RIGHTS IN THE ASSET;
(2) DISCHARGES THE ASSIGNEE'S LIEN AND, TO THE EXTENT THE
ASSIGNMENT CREATES A SECURITY INTEREST IN FAVOR OF THE ASSIGNEE,
THE ASSIGNEE'S SECURITY INTEREST; AND
(3) DISCHARGES ANY SUBORDINATE SECURITY INTEREST OR OTHER
LIEN SUBORDINATE TO THE ASSIGNEE'S LIEN.
(b) A TRANSFEREE THAT ACTS IN GOOD FAITH TAKES FREE OF THE
RIGHTS AND INTERESTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (a) OF THIS SECTION,
EVEN IF THE ASSIGNEE FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THIS ARTICLE 22 OR THE
REQUIREMENTS OF A JUDICIAL PROCEEDING.
(c) IF A TRANSFEREE DOES NOT TAKE FREE OF THE RIGHTS AND
INTERESTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (a) OF THIS SECTION, THE
TRANSFEREE TAKES THE ASSET SUBJECT TO:
(1) THE ASSIGNEE'S RIGHTS IN THE ASSETS OF THE ASSIGNMENT
ESTATE;
(2) THE ASSIGNEE'S LIEN AND, IF APPLICABLE, SECURITY INTEREST;
AND
-23- SB26-079

(3) ANY OTHER SECURITY INTEREST OR OTHER LIEN.
(d) UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN A RECORD, ANY WARRANTY
ARISING BY OPERATION OF OTHER LAW IS DISCLAIMED TO THE EXTENT
PERMITTED BY OTHER LAW.
(e) IF A SUBORDINATE SECURITY INTEREST OR OTHER LIEN IS
DISCHARGED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ASSIGNEE MAY FILE A RECORD
WITH THE OFFICIAL OR OFFICE RESPONSIBLE FOR MAINTAINING AN OFFICIAL
FILING, RECORDING, REGISTRATION, OR CERTIFICATE-OF-TITLE SYSTEM
COVERING THE ASSET SECURED BY THE SECURITY INTEREST OR OTHER
LIEN. THE RECORD MUST STATE THAT THE SECURITY INTEREST OR OTHER
LIEN IS DISCHARGED AS A SUBORDINATE SECURITY INTEREST OR OTHER
LIEN IN CONNECTION WITH A DISPOSITION UNDER AN ASSIGNMENT FOR THE
BENEFIT OF CREDITORS OF THE ASSIGNOR WHOSE ASSET IS SUBJECT TO THE
SECURITY INTEREST OR OTHER LIEN.
5-22-115. Distributions - definition.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, "PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR" MEANS A
SECURED CREDITOR WHOSE LIEN:
(1) IS A PERFECTED LIEN;
(2) CANNOT BE AVOIDED BY THE ASSIGNEE UNDER SECTION
5-22-110 (b)(12); AND
(3) IS NOT SUBORDINATE TO THE ASSIGNEE'S LIEN.
(b) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 5-22-116, THE ASSIGNEE
SHALL PAY CLAIMS FROM THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE ALLOWED UNDER
SECTION 5-22-111 IN THE ORDER OF PRIORITY STATED IN THIS SECTION.
(c) UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED BETWEEN THE ASSIGNEE AND A
PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR, BEFORE DISTRIBUTIONS UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (d), (e), (f), AND (g) OF THIS SECTION, AND IN ACCORDANCE
-24- SB26-079

WITH THE PRIORITIES OF CREDITORS WITH LIENS UNDER OTHER LAW, THE
PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR SHALL RECEIVE THE ASSET OR THE
PROCEEDS FROM THE COLLECTION ON OR DISPOSITION OF THE ASSET TO
THE EXTENT OF THE VALUE OF THE PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR'S
INTEREST IN THE ASSET, LESS THE ASSIGNEE'S REASONABLE AND
NECESSARY EXPENSES OF PRESERVING OR DISPOSING OF THE ASSET TO THE
EXTENT THE EXPENSES BENEFIT THE PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR AND
ARE INCURRED WITH THE PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR'S CONSENT OR
ACQUIESCENCE. THE PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR HAS AN UNSECURED
CLAIM UNDER SUBSECTION (g)(2) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE AMOUNT OF
THE CLAIM THAT REMAINS AFTER DEDUCTING THE AMOUNT OR VALUE OF
AN ASSET THE PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR RECEIVES UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (c). TO THE EXTENT A CLAIM IS SECURED BY AN ASSET THE
VALUE OF WHICH, AFTER THE DEDUCTIONS PROVIDED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (c), IS GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT OF THE CLAIM, THE
PROTECTED SECURED CREDITOR MAY RECEIVE INTEREST ON THE CLAIM
AND ANY REASONABLE FEES, COSTS, OR CHARGES PROVIDED FOR UNDER
THE AGREEMENT OR OTHER LAW UNDER WHICH THE CLAIM AROSE.
(d) AFTER THE DISTRIBUTIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (c) OF THIS
SECTION, THE ASSIGNEE SHALL PAY THE NECESSARY COSTS OF THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE. THE COSTS INCLUDE:
(1) FEES AND REIMBURSEMENTS OF THE EXPENSES OF THE
ASSIGNEE AND ANY PROFESSIONALS ENGAGED BY THE ASSIGNEE;
(2) POST-ASSIGNMENT TAXES INCURRED BY THE ASSIGNEE;
(3) POST-ASSIGNMENT RENT INCURRED BY THE ASSIGNEE IN
OCCUPYING PREMISES ON WHICH ASSETS OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE ARE
LOCATED OR THE BUSINESS OF THE ASSIGNOR IS CONDUCTED;
-25- SB26-079

(4) POST-ASSIGNMENT LEASE PAYMENTS INCURRED BY THE
ASSIGNEE IN RENTING PERSONAL PROPERTY USED IN THE BUSINESS OF THE
ASSIGNOR; AND
(5) AMOUNTS REQUIRED TO BE PAID UNDER THE ASSIGNMENT
AGREEMENT FOR EXPENSES OF WINDING UP THE ASSIGNMENT UNDER
SECTION 5-22-119.
(e) AFTER THE DISTRIBUTIONS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (d) OF
THIS SECTION, THE ASSIGNEE SHALL PAY CLAIMS ENTITLED TO PRIORITY
UNDER FEDERAL LAW, INCLUDING UNDER 31 U.S.C. SEC. 3713, AS
AMENDED, FROM THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE.
(f) AFTER THE DISTRIBUTIONS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (c), (d), AND
(e) OF THIS SECTION, THE ASSIGNEE SHALL PAY CLAIMS FROM THE
ASSIGNMENT ESTATE FOR WAGES, SALARIES, OR COMMISSIONS EARNED
NOT MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS BEFORE THE EARLIER OF THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT OR THE CESSATION OF
THE ASSIGNOR'S BUSINESS. PAYMENT SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE GREATER
OF:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF THE CLAIM ALLOWED AS A PRIORITY CLAIM
AHEAD OF CLAIMS OF OTHER UNSECURED CREDITORS UNDER THE FEDERAL
BANKRUPTCY CODE OF 1978, TITLE 11 OF THE UNITED STATES CODE, AS
AMENDED; OR
(2) THE AMOUNT ALLOWED AS A PRIORITY CLAIM AHEAD OF
CLAIMS OF OTHER UNSECURED CREDITORS UNDER APPLICABLE
NON-BANKRUPTCY LAW.
(g) AFTER THE DISTRIBUTIONS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (c), (d), (e),
AND (f) OF THIS SECTION, EACH CREDITOR SHALL RECEIVE A DISTRIBUTION
OF THE ASSETS OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE IN THE FOLLOWING ORDER OF
-26- SB26-079

PRIORITY:
(1) UNSECURED CLAIMS ENTITLED TO PRIORITY AHEAD OF CLAIMS
OF OTHER UNSECURED CREDITORS UNDER OTHER LAW; AND
(2) UNSECURED CLAIMS NOT ENTITLED TO PRIORITY.
(h) IF THE ASSETS AVAILABLE FOR DISTRIBUTION TO CLAIMS WITH
EQUAL PRIORITY UNDER SUBSECTION (g) OF THIS SECTION ARE
INSUFFICIENT TO PAY THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CLAIMS WITH THAT
PRIORITY, EACH CREDITOR WITH A CLAIM WITH THAT PRIORITY SHALL
RECEIVE A PRO RATA DISTRIBUTION OF THE AVAILABLE ASSETS BASED ON
THE PROPORTION THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDITOR'S CLAIM BEARS TO THE
TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CLAIMS WITH THAT PRIORITY.
(i) IF THE CLAIMS ENTITLED TO THE DISTRIBUTION UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (c), (d), (e), (f), AND (g) OF THIS SECTION ARE PAID IN FULL,
THE RESIDUE SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO ALLOWED CLAIMS EVIDENCED BY
A LATE-FILED PROOF OF CLAIM, OTHER THAN A LATE-FILED CLAIM
ALLOWED BY THE ASSIGNEE UNDER SECTION 5-22-111 (b)(2), AND, AFTER
THE ALLOWED CLAIMS EVIDENCED BY A LATE-FILED PROOF OF CLAIM HAVE
BEEN PAID IN FULL, AS PROVIDED IN THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT.
(j) AN ASSIGNEE MAY MAKE INTERIM DISTRIBUTIONS AFTER
CONSIDERING FUTURE EXPENSES AND THE RESERVES FOR DISPUTED CLAIMS
ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 5-22-112 (c).
5-22-116. Claim subordination.
(a) A SUBORDINATION AGREEMENT IS ENFORCEABLE UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 22 TO THE SAME EXTENT THE AGREEMENT IS ENFORCEABLE
UNDER OTHER LAW.
(b) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (c) OF THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING
CLAIMS ARE SUBORDINATE TO A CLAIM OR INTEREST THAT IS SENIOR OR
-27- SB26-079

EQUAL IN PRIORITY TO A CLAIM OR INTEREST REPRESENTED BY A SECURITY
OR OTHER EQUITY INTEREST IN THE ASSIGNOR OR AN AFFILIATE OF THE
ASSIGNOR:
(1) A CLAIM ARISING FROM RESCISSION OF A PURCHASE OR SALE OF
THE SECURITY OR OTHER EQUITY INTEREST;
(2) A CLAIM FOR DAMAGES ARISING FROM THE PURCHASE OR SALE
OF THE SECURITY OR OTHER EQUITY INTEREST; AND
(3) A CLAIM FOR REIMBURSEMENT OR CONTRIBUTION ALLOWED ON
ACCOUNT OF THE RESCISSION OR DAMAGE CLAIM.
(c) IF THE SECURITY IS COMMON STOCK OR ANOTHER COMMON
EQUITY INTEREST, A CLAIM SUBJECT TO SUBORDINATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS SECTION HAS THE SAME PRIORITY AS COMMON
STOCK OR ANOTHER COMMON EQUITY INTEREST.
5-22-117. Liability.
(a) AN ASSIGNOR IS NOT PERSONALLY LIABLE FOR AN ACT OR
OMISSION BY THE ASSIGNEE.
(b) AN ASSIGNEE IS NOT PERSONALLY LIABLE FOR AN ACT OR
OMISSION BY THE ASSIGNOR.
(c) A REPRESENTATIVE DESIGNATED BY AN ASSIGNOR UNDER
SECTION 5-22-108 (b)(4) IS EXCULPATED TO THE SAME EXTENT AS A
PERSON ACTING ON BEHALF OF THE ASSIGNOR UNDER OTHER LAW HAD
THERE BEEN NO ASSIGNMENT, EXCEPT FOR AN ACT OR OMISSION
RESULTING FROM THE REPRESENTATIVE'S GROSS NEGLIGENCE OR WILLFUL
MISCONDUCT.
(d) A TERM OF AN ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT RELIEVING THE
ASSIGNEE OF LIABILITY IS UNENFORCEABLE TO THE EXTENT THE
AGREEMENT RELIEVES THE ASSIGNEE OF LIABILITY FOR AN ACT OR
-28- SB26-079

OMISSION COMMITTED IN BAD FAITH OR WITH RECKLESS INDIFFERENCE TO
THE PURPOSES OF THE ASSIGNMENT OR THE INTERESTS OF THE CREDITORS
OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE.
(e) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (f) OF THIS SECTION, AN ASSIGNEE IS
PERSONALLY LIABLE FOR BREACH OF A FIDUCIARY DUTY UNDER SECTION
5-22-109 (a). IF THE ASSIGNEE IS LIABLE:
(1) THE ASSIGNEE IS PERSONALLY LIABLE TO A CREDITOR FOR AN
INDIVIDUALIZED HARM TO THE CREDITOR IF THE HARM IS NOT SHARED BY
ALL CREDITORS OR A CLASS OF CREDITORS; AND
(2) THE ASSIGNEE IS PERSONALLY LIABLE TO THE ASSIGNMENT
ESTATE FOR A HARM SHARED BY ALL CREDITORS OR A CLASS OF
CREDITORS.
(f) AN ASSIGNEE IS NOT LIABLE IF, IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE
ASSIGNEE'S DUTIES AND EXERCISE OF THE ASSIGNEE'S POWERS, THE
ASSIGNEE RELIES IN GOOD FAITH ON:
(1) A RECORD OF THE ASSIGNOR;
(2) INFORMATION, AN OPINION, A REPORT, OR A STATEMENT
PRESENTED TO THE ASSIGNEE BY THE ASSIGNOR'S OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE,
A COMMITTEE OF THE ASSIGNOR'S BOARD OF DIRECTORS, AN INDEPENDENT
DIRECTOR OR MANAGER OF THE ASSIGNOR, OR ANOTHER REPRESENTATIVE
OF THE ASSIGNOR; OR
(3) INFORMATION, AN OPINION, A REPORT, OR A STATEMENT
PRESENTED TO THE ASSIGNEE BY ANOTHER PERSON THAT HAS BEEN
SELECTED WITH REASONABLE CARE BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE ASSIGNEE AS
TO A MATTER THE ASSIGNEE REASONABLY BELIEVES IS WITHIN THE OTHER
PERSON'S PROFESSIONAL OR EXPERT COMPETENCE.
5-22-118. Assignee removal - successor assignee.
-29- SB26-079

(a) THE ASSIGNOR OR A CREDITOR MAY REQUEST IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION IN THIS STATE TO REMOVE THE ASSIGNEE IF THE
ASSIGNOR OR CREDITOR HAS A REASONABLE BELIEF THAT GROUNDS FOR
REMOVAL EXIST UNDER SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) AFTER A REQUEST UNDER SUBSECTION (a) OF THIS SECTION OR
ON THE COURT'S INITIATIVE IN AN ACTION PENDING BEFORE THE COURT
UNDER SECTION 5-22-121, THE COURT MAY REMOVE AN ASSIGNEE:
(1) FOR CAUSE, INCLUDING THE ASSIGNEE'S FRAUD, DISHONESTY,
INCOMPETENCE, GROSS MISMANAGEMENT, OR FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH
THIS ARTICLE 22; OR
(2) IF REMOVAL OF THE ASSIGNEE BEST SERVES THE INTERESTS OF
THE CREDITORS.
(c) AFTER AN ASSIGNEE RESIGNS, OR IS REMOVED, DIES, OR
BECOMES INCAPACITATED, A SUCCESSOR ASSIGNEE PROVIDED FOR IN THE
ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT BECOMES THE ASSIGNEE, UNLESS THE
SUCCESSOR ASSIGNEE IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO BE AN ASSIGNEE UNDER SECTION
5-22-104 (a) OR IS SUBJECT TO REMOVAL UNDER SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS
SECTION. A COURT SHALL APPOINT A SUCCESSOR ASSIGNEE IF:
(1) THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT DOES NOT PROVIDE FOR A
SUCCESSOR ASSIGNEE; OR
(2) THE SUCCESSOR ASSIGNEE PROVIDED FOR IN THE ASSIGNMENT
AGREEMENT IS INELIGIBLE TO BE AN ASSIGNEE UNDER SECTION 5-22-104
(a) OR IS SUBJECT TO REMOVAL UNDER SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS SECTION.
(d) SUBJECT TO SECTION 5-22-117, AN ASSIGNEE THAT RESIGNS, OR
IS REMOVED, DIES, OR BECOMES INCAPACITATED, IS DISCHARGED FROM
THE ASSIGNEE'S DUTIES UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22 WHEN THE ASSIGNEE, OR
A REPRESENTATIVE OF A DECEASED OR INCAPACITATED ASSIGNEE:
-30- SB26-079

(1) ACCOUNTS FOR AND TURNS OVER TO THE SUCCESSOR ASSIGNEE
ALL ASSETS OF THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE; AND
(2) SUBMITS TO CREDITORS A REPORT SUMMARIZING THE RECEIPTS
AND DISBURSEMENTS MADE DURING THE SERVICE OF THE ASSIGNEE.
(e) SUBJECT TO AN APPLICABLE PRIVILEGE, A COURT MAY ORDER
AN ATTORNEY, ACCOUNTANT, OR OTHER PERSON THAT HAS INFORMATION
IN A RECORD RELATING TO THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE OR THE ASSIGNOR'S
FINANCIAL AFFAIRS TO TURN OVER OR DISCLOSE THE RECORD TO THE
SUCCESSOR ASSIGNEE.
5-22-119. Winding up.
(a) ON COMPLETION OF AN ASSIGNEE'S DUTIES, THE ASSIGNEE
SHALL SEND A CREDITOR WHOSE CLAIM IS ALLOWED UNDER SECTION
5-22-111, AND NOT SATISFIED IN FULL, A FINAL ACCOUNTING SUFFICIENT
TO INFORM THE CREDITOR OF ALL MATERIAL ASPECTS OF THE ASSIGNMENT,
INCLUDING:
(1) A DESCRIPTION OF THE ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE ASSIGNEE
UNDER THE ASSIGNMENT;
(2) A SUMMARY OF THE ASSETS RECEIVED BY THE ASSIGNEE AT
THE COMMENCEMENT OF THE ASSIGNMENT AND THE ASSETS RECEIVED BY
THE ASSIGNEE DURING THE ASSIGNMENT;
(3) A SUMMARY OF DISBURSEMENTS MADE BY THE ASSIGNEE
DURING THE ASSIGNMENT FOR THE PURPOSE OF ADMINISTERING THE
ASSIGNMENT ESTATE, INCLUDING THE FEES CHARGED BY THE ASSIGNEE,
AND PAYMENTS TO PROFESSIONALS, FOR RENT, AND FOR BUSINESS
PURCHASES;
(4) A SUMMARY OF COLLECTIONS AND DISPOSITIONS OF ASSETS BY
THE ASSIGNEE;
-31- SB26-079

(5) A SUMMARY OF DISTRIBUTIONS MADE OR PROPOSED TO BE
MADE BY THE ASSIGNEE FOR CREDITOR CLAIMS;
(6) A DESCRIPTION OF ADDITIONAL WORK TO BE DONE BY THE
ASSIGNEE TO COMPLETE THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE ASSIGNMENT
ESTATE AND THE DISTRIBUTIONS UNDER SECTION 5-22-115; AND
(7) OTHER INFORMATION CONSIDERED REASONABLY NECESSARY
BY THE ASSIGNEE.
(b) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THE FINAL ACCOUNTING
OR IF THE ASSIGNEE HAS NOT FULFILLED THE ASSIGNEE'S DUTIES UNDER
THIS ARTICLE 22, THE ASSIGNEE IS DISCHARGED FROM THE ASSIGNEE'S
DUTIES UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22 WHEN THE ASSIGNEE SENDS THE FINAL
ACCOUNTING AND DISTRIBUTES ALL THE ASSETS OF THE ASSIGNMENT
ESTATE.
(c) IF THE FINAL ACCOUNTING DESCRIBES ADDITIONAL WORK
UNDER SUBSECTION (a)(6) OF THIS SECTION, THE ASSIGNEE SHALL
EXERCISE THE POWERS APPROPRIATE TO COMPLETE THE WORK.
5-22-120. Interstate matters.
(a) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (b) OF THIS SECTION, AN ASSIGNMENT
MADE UNDER THE LAW OF ANOTHER STATE MUST BE RECOGNIZED AND
ENFORCED ON AN ISSUE IF THE RESULT FOR THE ISSUE WOULD BE
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE RESULT FOR THE ISSUE IF THE
ASSIGNMENT HAD BEEN MADE UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22.
(b) IF A CLAIM FOR WAGES, SALARIES, OR COMMISSIONS OR A
CLAIM OF A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT EXISTS IN ANOTHER STATE, FOR THE
PURPOSE OF DETERMINING THE PRIORITY OF THE CLAIM UNDER SECTION
5-22-115 (f)(2), THE ASSIGNEE SHALL USE THE AMOUNT ASSERTED OR
DETERMINED UNDER THE LAW OF THE OTHER STATE.
-32- SB26-079

(c) IF AN ASSIGNEE DETERMINES THAT A CREDITOR SHOULD
RECEIVE THE TREATMENT THE CREDITOR WOULD RECEIVE UNDER AN
ASSIGNMENT MADE UNDER THE LAW OF ANOTHER STATE, THE ASSIGNEE
MAY TREAT THE CREDITOR AS THE CREDITOR WOULD BE TREATED IN THE
OTHER STATE.
5-22-121. Court action.
(a) A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION IN THIS STATE MAY
HEAR AND RESOLVE A MATTER INVOLVING THE ADMINISTRATION OF AN
ASSIGNMENT OR THE EXERCISE OF AN ASSIGNEE'S POWERS AND DUTIES,
INCLUDING A REQUEST FOR INSTRUCTIONS OR APPROVAL OR TO DECLARE
RIGHTS.
(b) WITHOUT LIMITING THE RIGHTS OF THE ASSIGNEE OR A
CREDITOR OR OTHER INTERESTED PERSON TO REQUEST THE COURT TO
HEAR OR RESOLVE A MATTER UNDER SUBSECTION (a) OF THIS SECTION, ON
REQUEST OF THE ASSIGNEE, THE COURT MAY ISSUE AN ORDER RELATING
TO THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE ASSIGNMENT OR THE EXERCISE OF THE
ASSIGNEE'S POWERS AND DUTIES, INCLUDING AN ORDER FOR DISPOSITION
OF AN ASSET OR THE INCURRENCE OF AN OBLIGATION.
(c) ACCEPTANCE OF THE ASSIGNMENT BY THE ASSIGNEE
CONSTITUTES THE ASSIGNEE'S CONSENT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE
COURT.
5-22-122. Ancillary assignee.
(a) SUBJECT TO OTHER LAW OF THIS STATE GOVERNING A PERSON
FROM ANOTHER STATE SERVING AS A FIDUCIARY IN THIS STATE, A COURT
OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION IN THIS STATE MAY APPOINT A PERSON
SERVING AS AN ASSIGNEE IN AN ASSIGNMENT IN ANOTHER STATE, OR THE
PERSON'S NOMINEE, AS AN ANCILLARY ASSIGNEE RELATING TO ASSIGNED
-33- SB26-079

ASSETS LOCATED IN THIS STATE OR SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION OF A
COURT IN THIS STATE IF:
(1) THE PERSON OR NOMINEE WOULD BE ELIGIBLE TO SERVE AS AN
ASSIGNEE UNDER SECTION 5-22-104; AND
(2) THE APPOINTMENT FURTHERS THE PERSON'S POSSESSION,
CUSTODY, CONTROL, OR DISPOSITION OF AN ASSIGNED ASSET UNDER THE
ASSIGNMENT IN THE OTHER STATE.
(b) THE COURT MAY ISSUE AN ORDER THAT IMPLEMENTS AN ORDER
ENTERED IN ANOTHER STATE APPOINTING OR DIRECTING AN ASSIGNEE OR
OTHERWISE CONCERNING AN ASSIGNMENT IN THE OTHER STATE.
(c) UNLESS THE COURT ORDERS OTHERWISE, AN ANCILLARY
ASSIGNEE APPOINTED UNDER SUBSECTION (a) OF THIS SECTION HAS THE
RIGHTS, POWERS, AND DUTIES OF AN ASSIGNEE APPOINTED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 22.
(d) A PERSON IN POSSESSION, CUSTODY, OR CONTROL OF AN
ASSIGNED ASSET IN THIS STATE, OTHER THAN A CREDITOR HOLDING A LIEN
OR A RIGHT OF SETOFF OR RECOUPMENT RELATING TO THE ASSET, SHALL,
ON NOTIFICATION IN A RECORD BY AN ANCILLARY ASSIGNEE APPOINTED
UNDER SUBSECTION (a) OF THIS SECTION, TURN OVER THE ASSET TO THE
ANCILLARY ASSIGNEE.
5-22-123. Provisions variable by agreement.
(a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION AND SECTION 5-22-110
(b), THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 22 MAY NOT BE VARIED BY
AGREEMENT.
(b) THE DUTIES UNDER SECTIONS 5-22-108 (a) AND 5-22-109 (a)
MAY NOT BE DISCLAIMED BY AGREEMENT. AN ASSIGNOR AND THE
ASSIGNEE MAY DETERMINE BY AGREEMENT THE STANDARDS MEASURING
-34- SB26-079

THE FULFILLMENT OF THE DUTIES OF THE ASSIGNOR UNDER SECTION
5-22-108 AND THE ASSIGNEE UNDER SECTION 5-22-109 IF THE STANDARDS
ARE NOT MANIFESTLY UNREASONABLE.
(c) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 5-22-117 (d), THE
ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT MAY LIMIT THE ASSIGNEE'S LIABILITY UNDER
SECTION 5-22-117 AND MAY REQUIRE THE ASSIGNEE BE INDEMNIFIED BY
THE ASSIGNMENT ESTATE.
(d) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 5-22-107 (a),
WHENEVER THIS ARTICLE 22 REQUIRES AN ACTION TO BE TAKEN WITHIN A
REASONABLE TIME, A TIME NOT MANIFESTLY UNREASONABLE MAY BE
FIXED BY AGREEMENT.
(e) THE ASSIGNMENT AGREEMENT MAY PROVIDE FOR DUTIES OF
THE ASSIGNEE IN ADDITION TO THOSE IN THIS ARTICLE 22.
5-22-124. Uniformity of application and construction.
IN APPLYING AND CONSTRUING THIS UNIFORM ACT, A COURT SHALL
CONSIDER THE PROMOTION OF UNIFORMITY OF THE LAW AMONG STATES
THAT ENACT IT.
5-22-125. Relation to "Electronic Signatures in Global and
National Commerce Act".
THIS ARTICLE 22 MODIFIES, LIMITS, AND SUPERSEDES THE FEDERAL
"ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES IN GLOBAL AND NATIONAL COMMERCE ACT",
15 U.S.C. SEC. 7001 ET SEQ., BUT DOES NOT MODIFY, LIMIT, OR SUPERSEDE
SECTION 101 (c) OF THAT ACT, 15 U.S.C. SEC. 7001 (c), OR AUTHORIZE
ELECTRONIC DELIVERY OF ANY OF THE NOTICES DESCRIBED IN SECTION 103
(b) OF THAT ACT, 15 U.S.C. SEC. 7003 (b).
5-22-126. Transitional provision.
THIS ARTICLE 22 APPLIES TO AN ASSIGNMENT MADE ON OR AFTER
-35- SB26-079

THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS ARTICLE 22.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-36- SB26-079